Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202670-2202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Large Load Customer Regulation Act:

(1) Large load customer means a retail load customer requesting a new or expanded interconnection where the total load at a single site would exceed twenty megawatts;

(2) Onsite backup generating facilities means (a) generation of one megawatt or larger that is not capable of operating in parallel with the grid for greater than one-tenth of a second or (b) generation of one megawatt or larger that is capable of operating continuously in parallel with the grid, non-exporting, and meeting applicable generator interconnection requirements; and

(3) Public power supplier means a public power district organized under Chapter 70, article 6, a public power and irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership association, a joint entity formed under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, a joint public agency formed under the Joint Public Agency Act, an agency formed under the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, or any other governmental entity providing electric service.

Laws 2026, LB1010, § 2.
July 18, 2026
Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, see section 18-2401.